Washington statutes.
RCW 3.30.030

Nomenclature for judges and courts.

The judges of each district court district shall be the justices of the peace of the district elected or appointed as provided in chapters 3.30 through 3.74 RCW. Such courts shall alternately be referred to as district courts and the judges thereof as district judges.

[ 1984 c 258 s 4; 1971 c 73 s 1; 1961 c 299 s 3.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.